ro-RO: Abilitate antrenată: Agilitate; Condiționare fizică; Apărare; Dribling; Joc de picioare; Abilități multiple; Pase; Recuperări; Șuturi / aruncări; Săritură verticală; Altele
sk-SK: Zameranie na zručnosť: Obratnosť; Kondícia; Obrana; Dribling; Práca nôh; Viacero zručností; Prihrávky; Doskakovanie; Streľba; Vertikálny výskok; Iné
bg-BG: Фокус на умението: Пъргавина; Кондиционна тренировка; Защита; Дрибъл; Работа с крака; Множество умения; Подаване; Борба под коша; Стрелба; Вертикален отскок; Други
lt-LT: Įgūdžių lavinimo kryptis: Vikrumas; Fizinis pasirengimas; Gynyba; Varymasis; Kojų darbas; Keli įgūdžiai; Perdavimas; Atkovoti kamuoliai; Metimas; Šuolis į aukštį; Kita
tr: Beceri odağı: Çeviklik; Kondisyon; Savunma; Top sürme; Ayak hareketi; Çoklu beceri; Paslaşma; Ribaund; Şut çekme; Dikey sıçrama; Diğer
pt-PT: Foco na habilidade: Agilidade; Condicionamento; Defesa; Drible; Trabalho de pés; Várias competências; Passe; Ressalto; Remate; Salto vertical; Outro
pl: Skupienie uwagi: Zwinność; Kondycja; Obrona; Drybling; Praca nóg; Wiele umiejętności; Podawanie; Zbiórki; Strzały / rzuty; Wyskok w pionie; Inne
ru: Фокус навыка: Ловкость; Общая физическая подготовка; Защита; Дриблинг; Работа ног; Множественные навыки; Пасы; Подборы; Броски; Прыжок в высоту; Другое
fr: Compétence travaillée: Agilité; Conditionnement physique; Défense; Dribble; Jeu de jambes; Compétences multiples; Passes; Rebonds; Tirs; Détente verticale; Autre
vi: Tập trung vào kỹ năng: Nhanh nhẹn; Thể lực; Phòng thủ; Rê bóng; Kỹ thuật chân; Nhiều kỹ năng; Chuyền bóng; Bắt bóng bật bảng; Ném bóng/sút bóng; Bật cao; Khác
hu: Fejlesztendő készség: Agilitás; Kondicionálás; Védekezés; Cselezés; Lábmunka; Többféle képesség; Passzolás; Lepattanózás; Dobás; Súlypontemelkedés; Egyéb
hr-HR: Fokus vještine: Agilnost; Kondicija; Obrana; Vođenje lopte / Dribling; Rad nogu; Višestruke vještine; Dodavanje; Skakanje / Skok; Gađanje / Pucanje; Okomiti skok; Ostalo
th: การมุ่งเน้นทักษะ: ความคล่องตัว; การปรับสภาพร่างกาย; การป้องกัน; การเลี้ยงลูก; ฟุตเวิร์ก; หลายทักษะ; การส่งลูก; การรีบาวด์; การยิงประตู; การกระโดดสูง; อื่นๆ
fi: Pääasiallinen taito: Ketteryys; Kuntoilu; Puolustus; Kuljetus; Jalkatyö; Useita taitoja; Syöttäminen; Levypallot; Heittäminen; Ponnistusvoima; Muu
it: Focus sulla competenza: Agilità; Condizionamento; Difesa; Dribbling; Gioco di gambe; Abilità multiple; Passaggio; Rimbalzo; Tiro; Salto verticale; Altro
sv: Färdighetsfokus: Smidighet; Kondition; Försvar; Dribbling; Fotarbete; Flera färdigheter; Passningar; Returtagning; Skott; Vertikalhopp; Övrigt
da: Færdighedsfokus: Agilitet; Konditionstræning; Forsvar; Dribling; Fodarbejde; Flere færdigheder; Aflevering; Rebounding; Skud; Lodret spring; Andet
zh-CN: 核心训练技能: 敏捷度; 体能训练; 防守; 运球; 步法; 多项技能; 传球; 篮板球; 投篮; 垂直弹跳; 其他
en: Skill focus: Agility; Conditioning; Defense; Dribbling; Footwork; Multiple skills; Passing; Rebounding; Shooting; Vertical leap; Other
zh-TW: 技能重點: 敏捷度; 體能訓練; 防守; 運球; 步法; 多重技能; 傳球; 籃板球; 投籃/射門; 垂直起跳; 其他
es: Enfoque de habilidades: Agilidad; Acondicionamiento; Defensa; Regate; Juego de pies; Múltiples habilidades; Pases; Rebotes; Tiros; Salto vertical; Otro
ja: スキル重視: アジリティ; コンディショニング; ディフェンス; ドリブル; フットワーク; 複数スキル; パス; リバウンド; シュート; 垂直跳び; その他
ko: 기술 중점: 민첩성; 컨디셔닝; 수비; 드리블; 풋워크; 복합 기술; 패스; 리바운드; 슈팅; 수직 점프; 기타
nb: Ferdighetsfokus: Smidighet; Kondisjon; Forsvar; Dribling; Fotarbeid; Flere ferdigheter; Pasninger; Returer; Skyting; Vertikalt hopp; Annet
el: Εστίαση σε δεξιότητα: Ευελιξία; Φυσική κατάσταση; Άμυνα; Ντρίμπλα; Κίνηση ποδιών; Πολλαπλές δεξιότητες; Πάσα; Ριμπάουντ; Σουτ; Κάθετο άλμα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Osredotočenost na spretnost: Okretnost; Kondicija; Obramba; Vodenje žoge; Delo nog; Več spretnosti; Podajanje; Skoki; Metanje; Odriv v višino; Drugo
de: Trainingsschwerpunkt: Agilität; Kondition; Abwehr; Dribbling; Beinarbeit; Mehrere Fähigkeiten; Passspiel; Rebounding; Schusstechnik; Sprungkraft; Andere
cs: Zaměření dovednosti: Hbitost; Kondice; Obrana; Dribling; Práce nohou; Více dovedností; Přihrávky; Doskoky; Střelba; Výskok; Jiné
pt-BR: Habilidade foco: Agilidade; Condicionamento; Defesa; Drible; Trabalho de pés; Várias habilidades; Passe; Rebote; Arremesso; Salto vertical; Outro
nl: Vaardigheid focus: Behendigheid; Conditie; Verdediging; Dribbelen; Voetenwerk; Meerdere vaardigheden; Passen; Rebounden; Schieten; Verticale sprong; Overig